Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1099
Repealed. Laws 2018, LB377, § 87. Operative date January 1, 2019. Schoolhouse; erection or improvement; equipment; submission to voters.

In all Class I school districts, the proposition described in section 79-1098 shall be submitted at any annual or special meeting of the legal voters of the school district. In all other districts the manner of submission shall be governed in substance by section 23-126.

Laws 1935, c. 170, § 2, p. 624;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-134;

R.S.1943, § 79-145;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 62, p. 713;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-423;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 745;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 34.

This section (formerly section 79-423) mandates that in Class I school districts, propositions to raise money through a special annual tax for the purpose of making additions and improvements to an existing schoolhouse must be voted on and approved by the electors of the school district at the district's annual or special meeting. Rauert v. School Dist. 1-R of Hall Cty., 251 Neb. 135, 555 N.W.2d 763 (1996).